Vermont statutes. Title 5 Aeronautics and Surface Transportation Generally
Chapter 20. Agency of Transportation; Powers

§ 1601.
Agency of Transportation; powers.

The Agency of Transportation shall supervise and direct the execution of all laws and Transportation Board orders relating to public transportation corporations and firms and individuals engaged in this business, including the:

formation, organization, ownership, and acquisition of facilities of corporations under chapter 22 of this title;

supervision and evaluation under chapter 24 of this title of the quality of service of public transportation companies;

review of proposed changes in rate schedules and petitions to the Transportation Board, and, at the discretion of the Secretary, representation of the interests of the consuming public in proceedings to change rate schedules of transportation companies under chapter 24 of this title;

consolidations and mergers of public transportation corporations under chapter 26 of this part of this title.

In cases requiring hearings by the Board, the Secretary of Transportation or his or her designee shall represent the interests of the public unless otherwise specified by law. In any hearing, the Board may, if it determines that the public interest would be served, request the Attorney General or a member of the Vermont Bar to represent the public or the State.

The Agency may bring proceedings on its own motion before the Transportation Board with respect to any matter within the jurisdiction of the Board, and may initiate rulemaking proceedings on matters within its jurisdiction. The Transportation Board, with respect to any matter within its jurisdiction, may issue orders on its own motion and may initiate rulemaking proceedings.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 224

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.